Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Chapter 21. General Provisions.

Sec. 04.21.010.
Municipal regulation and taxation.

A municipality may adopt ordinances governing the importation, barter, sale, and consumption of alcoholic beverages within the municipality and may ban possession of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491(a)(5)

. An ordinance adopted under this section may not be inconsistent with this title or regulations adopted under this title. In a municipality that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(a)(1)

, (2), or (3), an ordinance is not inconsistent with this title if it limits

the monthly amounts of alcoholic beverages a person may import into the municipality;

the percent of alcohol by volume that an alcoholic beverage may contain; a limit imposed under this paragraph may not be less than 40 nor more than 76 percent alcohol by volume; or

the type of alcoholic beverage container that may be possessed in the municipality.

After the adoption of a local option under AS

04.11.491(a)

, a municipality may adopt an ordinance making the sale, importation, or possession of alcoholic beverages a misdemeanor to the extent prohibited under the local option. The ordinance may not be inconsistent with this title or the regulations adopted under this title.

A municipality may not impose taxes on alcoholic beverages except a

property tax on alcoholic beverage inventories;

sales tax on alcoholic beverage sales if sales taxes are imposed on other sales within the municipality;

sales tax on alcoholic beverage sales that was in effect before July 1, 1985; and

sales and use tax on alcoholic beverages if the sale of alcoholic beverages within the municipality has been prohibited under AS

04.11.491(a)(1)

, (4), or (5).

At least 10 days before the date set for municipal action on an application for the issuance, renewal, relocation, or transfer of ownership of a proposed license, the municipality shall provide written notice of the proposed action and the time and place for a hearing to a community council that

is established by municipal charter or ordinance to advise the municipal governing body; and

has jurisdiction over the area affected by the proposed action.

History.

(§ 4 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 20 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 19 ch 93 SLA 1985; am § 9 ch 80 SLA 1986; am §§ 11, 12 ch 156 SLA 1988; am §§ 50 — 52 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Legislative history reports. —

For sectional analysis of CS SSSB 239, the predecessor of FCCSSB 239 (ch. 131, SLA 1980), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement No. 23, April 1, 1980.

For Senate letter of intent relating to the amendments to (a) and (c) of this section by secs. 11 and 12, ch. 156, SLA 1988 (HCS CSSB 371 (Jud) am H), see 1988 Senate Journal 2939.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Anchorage Municipal Code

10.50.030

and

10.50.035

, which established guidelines for when the Assembly will exercise its protest authority under AS

04.11.480

, are not inconsistent with this title, are not in excess of the municipality’s authority, and are not unreasonable. February 25, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Ordinance regulating where licenses may be located did not exceed the borough’s authority. October 23, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.21.012.
Keg registration.

A person may not purchase a keg or similar container holding four or more gallons of an alcoholic beverage unless the person provides proof that the person is over 21 years of age and completes and signs a registration form. The purchaser of a keg or similar container holding four or more gallons of an alcoholic beverage may not remove or obliterate the temporary identifying tag on the keg or container.

A licensee or an agent or employee of a licensee who sells or offers for sale a keg or similar container holding four or more gallons of an alcoholic beverage shall require a purchaser to show acceptable proof of age under AS

04.21.050(b)

and sign the sworn statement on a registration form. The licensee shall complete the registration form and affix a temporary tag with a unique identifier to the keg or container before releasing the container to the purchaser. The licensee shall retain a copy of the form for one year and make the form available for inspection.

The board shall prescribe a registration form for use by licensees and purchasers. The board may approve for use a registration form adopted by a local governing body. A registration form must include

the name of the seller;

the name of the purchaser;

a description of the proof of age provided by the buyer, including the identification number, if any;

the unique identifier on the temporary tag attached to the keg or container under (b) of this section.

A licensee or an agent or employee of a licensee who sells a keg or similar container holding four or more gallons of an alcoholic beverage without completing a registration form or affixing a temporary identification tag to the keg or container commits the crime of selling alcoholic beverages in an unregistered keg.

A person who is not licensed under this title or the employee or agent of a person who is not licensed under this title who possesses a keg or similar container holding four or more gallons of an alcoholic beverage without a temporary identification tag commits the crime of possessing alcoholic beverages in an unregistered keg.

Selling alcoholic beverages in an unregistered keg is a violation.

Possessing alcoholic beverages in an unregistered keg is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $100.

History.

(§ 135 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.21.015.
Private manufacture of alcoholic beverages.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, the provisions of this title do not apply to the private manufacture of alcoholic beverages.

This section does not apply to AS

04.16.050

,

04.16.051

,

04.16.080

; AS

04.21.010

,

04.21.020

; alcoholic beverages manufactured in a quantity that exceeds the limit imposed on private manufacture under federal law; or an area that has adopted a local option law under AS

04.11.491

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 88 SLA 1989; am § 53 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Sec. 04.21.020.
Civil liability of persons providing alcoholic beverages.

Except as provided under (b) and (d) of this section, a person who provides alcoholic beverages to another person may not be held civilly liable for injuries resulting from the intoxication of that person unless the person who provides the alcoholic beverages holds a license authorized under AS

04.11.080

—

04.11.220

or is an agent or employee of such a licensee and

the alcoholic beverages are provided to a person under the age of 21 years in violation of AS

04.16.051

, unless the licensee, agent, or employee secures in good faith from the person a signed statement, liquor identification card, or driver’s license meeting the requirements of AS

04.21.050(a)

and (b), that indicates that the person is 21 years of age or older; or

the alcoholic beverages are provided to a drunken person in violation of AS

04.16.030

.

A person who sells or barters an alcoholic beverage to another person in violation of AS

04.11.010

is strictly liable (1) to the recipient or another person for civil damages if, while under the influence of the alcoholic beverage, the person receiving the alcoholic beverage engages in conduct that results in civil damages and the recipient’s being under the influence of the alcoholic beverage substantially contributes to the civil damages; and (2) for the cost to the state or a political subdivision of the state to criminally prosecute a person who receives an alcoholic beverage from a person who violates AS

04.11.010

if the prosecution results from the violation of AS 04.11.010 described in this subsection.

In an action under (b) or (d) of this section, it is not a defense that the person receiving the alcoholic beverage voluntarily consumed the alcoholic beverage or that the person receiving the alcoholic beverage was voluntarily under the influence of the alcoholic beverage.

A person who knowingly furnishes or delivers an alcoholic beverage to a person under 21 years of age in violation of AS

04.16.051

is civilly liable to the recipient or another person for civil damages if, while under the influence of the alcoholic beverage, the person receiving the alcoholic beverage engages in conduct that results in civil damages and the recipient’s being under the influence of the alcoholic beverage substantially contributes to the civil damages.

In this section, “civil damages” includes damages for personal injury, death, or injury to property of a person, including the state or a political subdivision of the state.

History.

(§ 5 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 1997; am §§ 1, 2 ch 88 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1980, this section was rearranged for clarity.

Cross references. —

For responsibility of licensee for violations, see AS

04.16.150

; for responsibility of licensees, agents and employees, see AS

04.21.030

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 88, SLA 2002, provides that the 2002 amendments to this section apply “to a civil action that accrues on or after July 1, 2002.”

Sec. 04.21.020.
Civil liability of persons providing alcoholic beverages.

Except as provided under (b) and (d) of this section, a person who provides alcoholic beverages to another person may not be held civilly liable for injuries resulting from the intoxication of that person unless the person who provides the alcoholic beverages holds a license authorized under AS

04.09.020

—

04.09.370

or is an agent or employee of a licensee and

the alcoholic beverages are provided to a person under 21 years of age in violation of AS

04.16.051

, unless the licensee, agent, or employee secures in good faith from the person a signed statement, liquor identification card, or driver’s license meeting the requirements of AS

04.21.050(a)

and (b), that indicates that the person is 21 years of age or older; or

the alcoholic beverages are provided to a drunken person in violation of AS

04.16.030

.

A person who sells or barters an alcoholic beverage to another person in violation of AS

04.09.060

,

04.09.850

, or AS

04.11.010

is strictly liable (1) to the recipient or another person for civil damages if, while under the influence of the alcoholic beverage, the person receiving the alcoholic beverage engages in conduct that results in civil damages and the recipient’s being under the influence of the alcoholic beverage substantially contributes to the civil damages; and (2) for the cost to the state or a political subdivision of the state to criminally prosecute a person who receives an alcoholic beverage from a person who violates AS

04.11.010

if the prosecution results from the violation of AS 04.11.010 described in this subsection.

In an action under (b) or (d) of this section, it is not a defense that the person receiving the alcoholic beverage voluntarily consumed the alcoholic beverage or that the person receiving the alcoholic beverage was voluntarily under the influence of the alcoholic beverage.

A person who knowingly furnishes or delivers an alcoholic beverage to a person under 21 years of age in violation of AS

04.16.051

is civilly liable to the recipient or another person for civil damages if, while under the influence of the alcoholic beverage, the person receiving the alcoholic beverage engages in conduct that results in civil damages and the recipient’s being under the influence of the alcoholic beverage substantially contributes to the civil damages.

In this section, “civil damages” includes damages for personal injury, death, or injury to property of a person, including the state or a political subdivision of the state.

History.

(§ 5 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 1997; am §§ 1, 2 ch 88 SLA 2002; am § 136 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 137 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.21.025.
Alcohol server education course.

As a condition of issuance or renewal of a license and selling alcoholic beverages under a license, the board shall require a licensee who sells or serves alcoholic beverages and a licensee’s agents and employees who sell or serve alcoholic beverages or check the identification of a patron to complete an alcohol server education course approved by the board, if the license is for a

beverage dispensary;

restaurant or eating place;

club;

package store;

recreational site;

pub;

distillery;

conditional contractor.

The subjects that are included in an approved alcohol server education course shall be determined under regulations adopted by the board. In approving alcohol server education courses, the board shall consider the needs of both urban and rural licensees regarding access to an approved alcohol server education course. A licensee, agent, or employee who sells or serves alcoholic beverages shall keep the card described in (c) of this section or other proof acceptable to the board of successful completion of an approved alcohol server education course on the licensed premises during working hours.

A licensee, agent, or employee shall complete the course required under (a) of this section and pass a written test demonstrating an understanding of the course subjects not more than 30 days after being licensed or employed. The course provider shall issue a card to each individual who completes the course and passes the written test. A card issued under this subsection is valid for three years from the date of issue. A licensee, agent, or employee may renew a card issued under this section; to renew the card, the licensee, agent, or employee must pass a written test demonstrating an understanding of the course subjects.

The board shall review an approved alcohol server education course at least once every three years.

A person licensed as a common carrier dispensary shall train agents and employees who sell or serve alcoholic beverages or who check the identification of a patron on provisions of state law regarding sale of alcoholic beverages, including AS

04.16.015

,

04.16.020

,

04.16.030

,

04.16.051

,

04.16.052

,

04.16.120

,

04.16.125

, AS

04.21.030

, and

04.21.050

. The training must include the subjects of the effects of alcohol consumption, identifying a drunken person, determining valid identification, intervention to prevent unlawful alcohol consumption, and penalties for unlawful acts by agents and employees of licensees. A common carrier licensee shall, once every three years, provide the board with a description of its training program including the subjects taught, teaching method, and testing required.

History.

(§ 1 ch 9 SLA 1993; am §§ 54, 55 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 75 SLA 2005; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 2014)

Sec. 04.21.025.
Alcohol server education course.

Except as provided under (e) and (f) of this section, as a condition of issuance or renewal of a license or conditional contractor’s permit and selling alcoholic beverages under a license or conditional contractor’s permit, the board shall require a licensee or permittee who sells or serves alcoholic beverages and a licensee’s or permittee’s agents and employees who sell or serve alcoholic beverages or check the identification of a patron to complete an alcohol server education course approved by the board.

The subjects that are included in an approved alcohol server education course shall be determined under regulations adopted by the board. In approving alcohol server education courses, the board shall consider the needs of both urban and rural licensees regarding access to an approved alcohol server education course and allow a licensee, permittee, agent, or employee to complete an alcohol server education course online or in person. A licensee, permittee, agent, or employee who sells or serves alcoholic beverages shall keep the card described in (c) of this section or other proof acceptable to the board of successful completion of an approved alcohol server education course on the licensed premises during working hours.

A licensee, permittee, agent, or employee shall complete the course required under (a) of this section and pass a written test, online or in person, demonstrating an understanding of the course subjects not more than 30 days after being licensed, permitted, or employed. The course provider shall issue a card to each individual who completes the course and passes the written test. A card issued under this subsection is valid for three years from the date of issue. A licensee, permittee, agent, or employee may renew a card issued under this section; to renew the card, the licensee, permittee, agent, or employee must pass a written test demonstrating an understanding of the course subjects. Notwithstanding the 30-day period for completing the course and passing the written test under this subsection, a person may not sell or serve alcoholic beverages or check the identification of a patron at a permitted event under AS

04.09.600

—

04.09.690

unless the person possesses a valid card issued before the event.

The board shall review an approved alcohol server education course at least once every three years.

A person licensed as a common carrier dispensary shall train agents and employees who sell or serve alcoholic beverages or who check the identification of a patron on provisions of state law regarding sale of alcoholic beverages, including AS

04.16.015

,

04.16.020

,

04.16.030

,

04.16.051

,

04.16.052

,

04.16.120

,

04.16.125

, AS

04.21.030

, and

04.21.050

. The training must include the subjects of the effects of alcohol consumption, identifying a drunken person, determining valid identification, intervention to prevent unlawful alcohol consumption, and penalties for unlawful acts by agents and employees of licensees. A common carrier licensee shall, once every three years, provide the board with a description of its training program including the subjects taught, teaching method, and testing required.

This section does not apply to the following licenses:

brewery manufacturer license under AS

04.09.020

, unless the licensee holds a manufacturer sampling endorsement;

winery manufacturer license under AS

04.09.030

, unless the licensee holds a manufacturer sampling endorsement;

distillery manufacturer license under AS

04.09.040

, unless the licensee holds a manufacturer sampling endorsement;

general wholesale license under AS

04.09.100

;

limited wholesale brewed beverage and wine license under AS

04.09.110

;

manufacturer direct shipment license under AS

04.09.370

.

A person who violates (a) — (c) or (e) of this section commits the offense of failure to comply with alcohol server education requirements.

Failure to comply with alcohol server education requirements is a violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 9 SLA 1993; am §§ 54, 55 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 75 SLA 2005; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 2014; § 138 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 139 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 140 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 141 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.21.030.
Responsibility of licensees, agents, and employees.

The licensee has a duty to exercise that degree of care that a reasonable person would observe to ensure that a business under the person’s control is lawfully conducted.
This duty of the licensee includes, but is not limited

to ensuring the compliance by agents or employees with this title and regulations adopted under this title, including acting with reasonable diligence to determine that agents or employees are advised of the provisions of this title and the regulations adopted under this title, either by securing the agent’s or employee’s written acknowledgement of posted instructions or otherwise; and

to ensuring the compliance of the premises with public health, fire, and safety codes and ordinances of the state or municipality having jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 4 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For responsibility of licensee for violations, see AS

04.16.150

.

Sec. 04.21.035.
Responsibility of partners of a limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership.

Notwithstanding any other provision of AS 32.06, a partner of a limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability partnership holding a license under this title is not relieved of the obligation or the liability otherwise imposed upon a holder of a liquor license under this title solely because the license is held by a limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability partnership.

History.

(§ 16 ch 74 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 115 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 2011)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective August 25, 2011, rewrote the section heading and text which read, “Responsibility of limited liability organization members. Notwithstanding any other provision of AS 10.50 or AS 32.06, a member of a limited liability organization holding a license under this title is not relieved of the obligation or the liability otherwise imposed upon a holder of a liquor license under this title solely because the license is held by a limited liability organization.”

Sec. 04.21.040.
Sales on federal reservations.

A wholesaler of alcoholic beverages may sell alcoholic beverages to a person who does not have a license under this title who has a fixed place of business on land in the state maintained by the United States government as a military or naval reservation, a national park, or other federal reservation. A sale may be made under this section only if the purchaser is a ship’s service store, officers club, officers mess, post exchange, or similar organization. The wholesaler may deliver alcoholic beverages only to persons specified and at places designated in a written order issued by the federal organization for which the purchase is made. A licensee making sales and deliveries under this section shall keep the original order attached to the copy of the invoice on file at the premises of the licensee.

Alcoholic beverages received on federal reservations under this section may not be removed for resale or public use outside the federal reservation.

A wholesaler who sells alcoholic beverages on a federal reservation under this section shall pay the state excise tax imposed by AS

43.60.010

on the alcoholic beverages sold and may subsequently claim credit for the excise taxes paid if the sale is made to an organization that is an instrumentality of the federal government.

History.

(§ 4 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.21.050.
Proof of age and of not being restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages.

If a licensee or an agent or employee of the licensee questions or has reason to question whether a person entering licensed premises, or ordering, purchasing, attempting to purchase, or otherwise procuring or attempting to procure alcoholic beverages,

has attained the age of 21 years or is entering without consent in violation of AS

04.16.049(a)(3)

and has not attained the age of 16 years, that licensee, agent, or employee shall require the person to furnish proof of age acceptable under (b) of this section or proof of consent in a form determined by the board; if the person questioned does not furnish proof of age acceptable under (b) of this section, or if a licensee, agent, or employee questions or has reason to question the validity of the proof of age furnished, the licensee, employee, or agent shall require the person to sign a statement that the person is over the age of 21 or 16 years, as appropriate; this statement shall be made on a form prepared by and furnished to the licensee by the board;

is restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages under AS

04.16.160

, the licensee, agent, or employee may, but has no duty or obligation to, require the person to furnish proof acceptable under (b) of this section that the person is not restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages or require the person to sign a statement that the person is not restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages under AS

04.16.160

; this statement shall be made on a form prepared by and furnished to the licensee by the board.

Except as provided in AS

04.16.160

, a valid driver’s license or a valid identification card is acceptable as proof of age or that the person is not restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages when used for identification in the purchase of alcoholic beverages and for securing entry to and remaining on premises where alcoholic beverages are sold if the license or identification card is made of or encased in plastic and contains a photograph of the licensee or card holder and a statement of age or date of birth. A licensee, agent, or employee may elect to not accept a passport, military identification card, or other identification as proof that the person is not restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages and may require the person to furnish a valid driver’s license or state identification card or otherwise furnish proof that the person is not a resident of this state.

A licensee, or an agent or employee of the licensee, may not be charged for a violation of AS

04.16.047

—

04.16.052

if a signed statement as provided in (a) of this section is secured in good faith, or a valid driver’s license or identification card is presented indicating that the owner and possessor of the presented driver’s license or identification card is 21 or 16 years of age or over or is not restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages, as appropriate.

History.

(§ 4 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 15, 16 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 2007)

Sec. 04.21.050.
Proof of age and of not being restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages.

If a licensee or an agent or employee of the licensee questions or has reason to question whether a person entering licensed premises, or ordering, purchasing, attempting to purchase, or otherwise procuring or attempting to procure alcoholic beverages,

has attained the age of 21 years or is entering without consent in violation of AS

04.16.049(a)(2)

and has not attained the age of 16 years, that licensee, agent, or employee shall require the person to furnish proof of age acceptable under (b) of this section or proof of consent in a form determined by the board; if the person questioned does not furnish proof of age acceptable under (b) of this section, or if a licensee, agent, or employee questions or has reason to question the validity of the proof of age furnished, the licensee, employee, or agent shall require the person to sign a statement that the person is over the age of 21 or 16 years, as appropriate; this statement shall be made on a form prepared by and furnished to the licensee by the board;

is restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages under AS

04.16.160

, the licensee, agent, or employee may, but has no duty or obligation to, require the person to furnish proof acceptable under (b) of this section that the person is not restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages or require the person to sign a statement that the person is not restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages under AS

04.16.160

; this statement shall be made on a form prepared by and furnished to the licensee by the board.

Except as provided in AS

04.16.160

, a valid driver’s license or a valid identification card is acceptable as proof of age or that the person is not restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages when used for identification in the purchase of alcoholic beverages and for securing entry to and remaining on premises where alcoholic beverages are sold if the license or identification card is made of or encased in plastic and contains a photograph of the licensee or card holder and a statement of age or date of birth. A licensee, agent, or employee may elect to not accept a passport, military identification card, or other identification as proof that the person is not restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages and may require the person to furnish a valid driver’s license or state identification card or otherwise furnish proof that the person is not a resident of this state.

A licensee, or an agent or employee of the licensee, may not be charged for a violation of AS

04.16.047

—

04.16.052

if a signed statement as provided in (a) of this section is secured in good faith, or a valid driver’s license or identification card is presented indicating that the owner and possessor of the presented driver’s license or identification card is 21 or 16 years of age or over or is not restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages, as appropriate.

History.

(§ 4 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 15, 16 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 142 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.21.055.
Refusal of service.

A licensee, an agent, or employee may refuse to sell, give, or serve alcoholic beverages to a person if the licensee, agent, or employee reasonably believes that the consumption of alcohol by that person may result in serious harm to that person or to others.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

04.11.700

. Renumbered in 1994.

Sec. 04.21.060.
Warehousing of alcoholic beverages.

A licensee may stock, warehouse, or otherwise store alcoholic beverages in a place elsewhere than premises indicated on the license if

the premises to be used for storage are inspected and approved by the board before their use;

the use of the premises for storage is authorized by local zoning ordinances; and

the premises are accessible for inspection as provided in AS

04.11.630

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For prohibition on sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages in a warehouse, see AS

04.16.140

.

Sec. 04.21.060.
Warehousing of alcoholic beverages.

A licensee may stock, warehouse, or otherwise store alcoholic beverages in a place elsewhere than premises indicated on the license if

the premises to be used for storage are inspected and approved by the board before their use;

the use of the premises for storage is authorized by local zoning ordinances; and

the premises are accessible for inspection as provided in AS

04.11.630

.

A licensee who stores alcoholic beverages elsewhere than on the licensed premises and who fails to comply with (a)(1) — (3) of this section commits the offense of unauthorized warehousing.

Unauthorized warehousing is a violation.

History.

(§ 4 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 143 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.21.065.
Posting of warning signs.

A holder of one of the following types of licenses or permits shall post on the licensed or designated premises three separate warning signs as described in (b) of this section:

beverage dispensary license;

restaurant or eating place license;

club license;

brewery license; this paragraph applies only to a brewery that permits a person to sample portions of the brewery’s product;

package store license;

common carrier dispensary license;

recreational site license;

pub license;

winery license; this paragraph applies only to a winery that permits a person to sample portions of the winery’s product;

distillery license; this paragraph applies only to a distillery that permits a person to sample portions of the distillery’s product;

caterer’s permit;

special events permit;

conditional contractor’s permit;

another license or permit issued by the board authorizing consumption of alcoholic beverages.

The warning signs required by (a) of this section must be at least 11 inches by 14 inches, and the lettering must be at least one-half inch high and in contrasting colors. The first sign must read, “WARNING: Drinking alcoholic beverages such as beer, wine, wine coolers, and distilled spirits or smoking cigarettes during pregnancy can cause birth defects.” The second sign must read, “WARNING: A person who provides alcoholic beverages to a person under 21 years of age, if convicted under AS

04.16.051

, could be imprisoned for up to five years and fined up to $50,000.” The third sign must read, “WARNING: An unaccompanied person under 21 years of age who enters these premises in violation of law may, under AS

04.16.049(e)

, be civilly liable for damages of $1,500.” The license or permit holder shall display the first and second signs in a manner that would make them conspicuous to a person who will be purchasing or consuming alcoholic beverages or smoking cigarettes on the licensed or designated premises and shall conspicuously display the third sign at each door through which customers enter the licensed premises.

The board shall furnish a sign required under this section to a person who requests it with the intention of displaying it.

A peace officer may issue a citation for a violation of this section. The provisions of AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

apply to the issuance of a citation under this subsection.

An employee of the board designated by the board to enforce this section may issue a citation for a violation of this section regardless of whether the violation was committed in the employee’s presence. A citation issued under this subsection must be in the same form and shall be processed in the same manner as a citation issued by a peace officer under (d) of this section. An employee of the board may not arrest a person for a violation of this section.

A holder of a license or permit who violates this section is guilty of a violation as defined in AS

11.81.900(b)

and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $20 nor more than $300. Each day a violation continues after a citation for the violation has been issued constitutes a separate violation.

The supreme court shall establish a schedule of bail amounts for violations of this section. The bail amount may not exceed the maximum fine that may be imposed for the violation under (f) of this section. The bail amount for a violation must appear on the citation.

If a person cited for a violation under this section does not contest the citation, the person may, on or before the 30th day after the date of the citation, mail or personally deliver to the clerk of the court in which the citation is filed

the amount of bail indicated on the citation for the violation; and

a copy of the citation indicating that the right to an appearance is waived, a plea of no contest is entered, and the bail is forfeited.

When bail has been forfeited under (h) of this section, a judgment of conviction shall be entered. Forfeiture of bail is a complete satisfaction for the violation. The clerk of the court accepting the bail shall provide the violator with a receipt stating that fact if requested.

A person cited under this section is guilty of failure to obey a citation under AS

12.25.230

if the person fails to pay the bail amount established under (g) of this section or to appear in court as required.

The board or any affected party may institute an action in the superior court to enjoin repeated violations of this section.

Notwithstanding AS

04.11.370

, the board is not required to suspend or revoke a license or permit for a violation of this section; however, the board may consider a violation of this section when determining under AS

04.11.370

(a)(2) whether continuation of activities authorized under a license or permit would be in the best interests of the public.

History.

(§ 2 ch 81 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 1991; am §§ 3, 4 ch 46 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 1995; am § 56 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 2, 3 ch 87 SLA 2001; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 29 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 2014; am § 4 ch 82 SLA 2014; am § 10 ch 32 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For warning sign bail forfeiture schedule, see Alaska Court Rule of Administration 43.7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, in (b), substituted “An unaccompanied” for “a” and “may” for “could”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (d), (h), and (j) of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent in connection with
ch. 81, SLA 1989 (HCS CSSB 175 (Jud)), see 1989 Senate Journal 1068; for House letter of intent, see 1989 House Journal 1769.